it: Configurazione della tastiera compatibile: Chiave 61; Chiave 76; Chiave 88; Altro
fr: Configuration du clavier compatible: Clé-61; Clé-76; Clé-88; Autre
bg-BG: Съвместима конфигурация на кийборда: 61-клавиша; 76-клавиша; 88-клавиша; Други
zh-CN: 兼容键盘配置: 61 键; 76 键; 88 键; 其他
zh-TW: 相容的鍵盤樂器配置: 61 鍵; 76 鍵; 88 鍵; 其他
nl: Compatibele keyboardconfiguratie: 61 toetsen; 76 toetsen; 88 toetsen; Andere
da: Kompatibel keyboardkonfiguration: 61-nøgle; 76-nøgle; 88-nøgle; Andet
de: Kompatible Keyboard-Konfiguration: 61-Tasten; 76-Tasten; 88-Tasten; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Configuração de teclado compatível: 61 teclas; 76 teclas; 88 teclas; Outro
el: Συμβατή διαμόρφωση πληκτρολογίου: 61 πλήκτρων; 76 πλήκτρων; 88 πλήκτρων; Άλλο
cs: Kompatibilní konfigurace klávesnice: 61 kláves; 76 kláves; 88 kláves; Jiné
ja: 使用可能なキーボード構成: 61鍵; 76鍵; 88鍵; その他
pl: Kompatybilna konfiguracja klawiatury: 61-klawiszowe; 76-klawiszowe; 88-klawiszowe; Inne
ro-RO: Configurație claviatură compatibilă: 61 de taste; 76 de taste; 88 de taste; Altele
sv: Kompatibel tangentbordskonfiguration: 61-nyckel; 76-nyckel; 88-nyckel; Övrigt
th: รูปร่างภายนอกของคีย์บอร์ดที่เข้ากันได้: 61 คีย์; 76 คีย์; 88 คีย์; อื่นๆ
hu: Kompatibilis billentyűkonfiguráció: 61 billentyűs; 76 billentyűs; 88 billentyűs; Egyéb
hr-HR: Kompatibilna konfiguracija klavijature: Ključ za klavijature sa 61 tipkom; Ključ za klavijature sa 76 tipki; Ključ za klavijature s 88 tipki; Ostalo
nb: Kompatibel tastaturkonfigurasjon: 61-nøkkel; 76-nøkkel; 88-nøkkel; Annet
ru: Совместимая конфигурация клавишного инструмента: 61 клавиша; 76 клавиш; 88 клавиш; Другое
vi: Cấu hình bàn phím tương thích: 61 phím; 76 phím; 88 phím; Khác
sk-SK: Kompatibilná konfigurácia klávesnice: 61-kľúčový; 76-kľúčový; 88-kľúčový; Iné
sl-SI: Združljiva konfiguracija tipkovnice: 61-tipk; 76-tipk; 88-tipk; Drugo
pt-BR: Configuração de teclado compatível: 61 teclas; 76 teclas; 88 teclas; Outro
en: Compatible keyboard configuration: 61-key; 76-key; 88-key; Other
tr: Uyumlu klavye yapılandırması: 61 tuşlu; 76 tuşlu; 88 tuşlu; Diğer
fi: Yhteensopiva näppäimistökonfiguraatio: 61-näppäiminen; 76-näppäiminen; 88-näppäiminen; Muu
lt-LT: Suderinama klaviatūros konfigūracija: 61 klavišo; 76 klavišų; 88 klavišų; Kita
es: Configuración de teclado compatible: 61 teclas; 76 teclas; 88 teclas; Otros
ko: 호환 가능한 키보드 구성: 61키; 76키; 88키; 기타